zh-TW: 轉接器操作模式: Auracast 發射器; 接收器（RX）; 含免持通話接收器; 發射器（TX）; 發射接收器（TX/RX）; 其他
sl-SI: Načini delovanja adapterja: Auracast oddajnik; Sprejemnik (RX); Sprejemnik s prostoročnim klicanjem; Oddajnik (TX); Oddajnik in sprejemnik (TX/RX); Drugo
nl: Adapter bedieningsmodi: Auracast-zender; Ontvanger (RX); Ontvanger met handsfree bellen; Zender (TX); Zender en ontvanger (TX/RX); Andere
pt-PT: Modos de operação do adaptador: Transmissor Auracast; Recetor (RX); Recetor com chamadas mãos-livres; Transmissor (TX); Transmissor e recetor (TX/RX); Outro
de: Betriebsmodi des Adapters: Auracast-Sender; Empfänger (RX); Empfänger mit Freisprechfunktion; Sender (TX); Sender und Empfänger (TX/RX); Sonstiges
el: Τρόποι λειτουργίας προσαρμογέα: Πομπός Auracast; Δέκτης (RX); Δέκτης με κλήσεις hands-free; Πομπός (TX); Πομπός και δέκτης (TX/RX); Άλλο
tr: Adaptör çalışma modları: Auracast vericisi; Alıcı (RX); Eller serbest aramalı alıcı; Verici (TX); Verici ve alıcı (TX/RX); Diğer
hr-HR: Radni načini adaptera: Auracast odašiljač; Prijemnik (RX); Prijemnik s hands-free pozivima; Odašiljač (TX); Odašiljač i prijemnik (TX/RX); Ostalo
fr: Modes de fonctionnement de l’adaptateur: Transmetteur Auracast; Récepteur (RX); Récepteur avec appel mains libres; Transmetteur (TX); Transmetteur et récepteur (TX/RX); Autre
sk-SK: Prevádzkové režimy adaptéra: Auracast vysielač; Prijímač (RX); Prijímač s hands-free volaním; Vysielač (TX); Vysielač a prijímač (TX/RX); Iné
en: Adapter operating modes: Auracast transmitter; Receiver (RX); Receiver with hands-free calling; Transmitter (TX); Transmitter and receiver (TX/RX); Other
sv: Adapterdriftslägen: Auracast-sändare; Mottagare (RX); Mottagare med handsfree-samtal; Sändare (TX); Sändare och mottagare (TX/RX); Övrigt
ja: アダプター動作モード: Auracastトランスミッター; レシーバー（RX）; ハンズフリー通話対応レシーバー; トランスミッター（TX）; トランスミッター兼レシーバー（TX/RX）; その他
fi: Sovittimen toimintatilat: Auracast-lähetin; Vastaanotin (RX); Vastaanotin hands-free-puheluilla; Lähetin (TX); Lähetin ja vastaanotin (TX/RX); Muu
es: Modos de operación del adaptador: Transmisor Auracast; Receptor (RX); Receptor con llamadas manos libres; Transmisor (TX); Transmisor y receptor (TX/RX); Otros
ko: 어댑터 작동 모드: 오라캐스트 송신기; 수신기 (RX); 핸즈프리 통화 수신기; 송신기 (TX); 송신기 및 수신기 (TX/RX); 기타
pt-BR: Modos de operação do adaptador: Transmissor Auracast; Receptor (RX); Receptor com chamadas viva-voz; Transmissor (TX); Transmissor e receptor (TX/RX); Outro
ru: Режимы работы адаптера: Передатчик Auracast; Приёмник (RX); Приёмник с громкой связью; Передатчик (TX); Передатчик и приёмник (TX/RX); Другой
lt-LT: Adapterio veikimo režimai: Auracast siųstuvas; Imtuvas (RX); Imtuvas su laisvų rankų skambinimu; Siųstuvas (TX); Siųstuvas ir imtuvas (TX/RX); Kita
nb: Adapter-driftsmodus: Auracast-sender; Mottaker (RX); Mottaker med håndfri ringing; Sender (TX); Sender og mottaker (TX/RX); Annet
vi: Chế độ hoạt động bộ chuyển đổi: Bộ phát Auracast; Bộ thu (RX); Bộ thu có chức năng gọi rảnh tay; Bộ phát (TX); Bộ phát và thu (TX/RX); Khác
hu: Adapterműködési módok: Auracast adó; Vevő (RX); Vevő kihangosítással; Adó (TX); Adó és vevő (TX/RX); Egyéb
da: Tilstande for adapterbetjening: Auracast-sender; Modtager (RX); Modtager med håndfri opkald; Sender (TX); Sender og modtager (TX/RX); Andet
zh-CN: 适配器操作模式: Auracast 发射器; 接收器 (RX); 带免提通话的接收器; 发射器 (TX); 发射器和接收器 (TX/RX); 其他
pl: Tryby pracy adaptera: Transmiter Auracast; Odbiornik (RX); Odbiornik z zestawem głośnomówiącym; Nadajnik (TX); Nadajnik i odbiornik (TX/RX); Inne
bg-BG: Работни режими на адаптера: Auracast предавател; Приемник (RX); Приемник с хендсфри повиквания; Предавател (TX); Предавател и приемник (TX/RX); Други
it: Modalità operative dell'adattatore: Trasmettitore Auracast; Ricevitore (RX); Ricevitore con chiamate vivavoce; Trasmettitore (TX); Trasmettitore e ricevitore (TX/RX); Altro
ro-RO: Moduri de operare adaptor: Transmițător Auracast; Receptor (RX); Receptor cu apelare hands-free; Transmițător (TX); Transmițător și receptor (TX/RX); Altele
th: โหมดการทำงานของอะแดปเตอร์: ตัวส่ง Auracast; ตัวรับ (RX); ตัวรับพร้อมการโทรแฮนด์ฟรี; ตัวส่ง (TX); ตัวส่งและตัวรับ (TX/RX); อื่นๆ
cs: Provozní režimy adaptéru: Auracast vysílač; Přijímač (RX); Přijímač s handsfree voláním; Vysílač (TX); Vysílač a přijímač (TX/RX); Jiné